New York, session 2025-2026, S5601.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 392-k to read as follows: 3 § 392-k. Catalytic converters; serial numbers. No catalytic converter 4 manufactured or assembled on or after January first, two thousand twen- 5 ty-six shall be sold or offered for sale as an individual part or as 6 part of a motor vehicle in this state unless it has an identifying seri- 7 al number that distinguishes that catalytic converter from all other 8 catalytic converters of that same make and model permanently and visibly 9 engraved or stamped in readily legible boldfaced figures at least one- 10 eighth inches in height in such a manner that the serial number cannot 11 be removed without being defaced or destroyed. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09572-01-5